Hawaii statutes.
§353-70 Final discharge. Whenever, in
its opinion, any paroled prisoner has given such evidence as is deemed reliable
and trustworthy that the paroled prisoner will remain at liberty without
violating the law and that the paroled prisoner's final release is not
incompatible with the welfare of society, the Hawaii paroling authority may
grant the prisoner a written discharge from further liability under the
prisoner's sentence.

Any paroled prisoner who has been on parole for
at least five years shall be brought before the paroling authority for purposes
of consideration for final discharge and complete pardon. In the event the
prisoner is not granted a final discharge and full pardon, the paroled prisoner
shall be brought before the paroling authority for the aforementioned purposes
annually thereafter.

Any person, who, while on parole, enters the
military service of the United States, may, upon the person's honorable
discharge therefrom, petition the paroling authority for a final discharge, and
the paroling authority may consider the honorable discharge as grounds for
granting a final discharge from parole and recommending to the governor a full
pardon. [L 1917, c 103, §7; RL 1925, §1566; am L 1931, c 126, §7; RL 1945,
§3963; am L 1949, c 2, §1; RL 1955, §83-68; am L 1957, c 308, §4; am L
1963, c 149, §1; HRS §353-70; am L 1976, c 92, pt of §8; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Final unconditional release, see §706-670.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next